Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1365.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2104(a)(1)(i), (2)(ii) and (4) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2104. Use of money in fund.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (a) Purposes.--Money in the fund shall be used as follows:(1) To annually provide the following grants for programs administered by the Department of Transportation:(i) For programs related to aviation the following shall be transferred to the Aviation Restricted Account:(A) $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2013-2014.(B) $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2014-2015 [and each fiscal year thereafter.] until fiscal year 2027-2028.(C) $18,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 and each fiscal year thereafter.* * *(2) To annually pay costs incurred by the department for activities directly initiated or undertaken by the department related to eligible programs in accordance with all of the following:* * *(ii) Costs may be incurred as follows:(A) $0 for fiscal year 2013-2014.(B) Not to exceed $20,000,000 for fiscal year 2014-2015.(C) Not to exceed $40,000,000 annually in fiscal year 2015-2016 [and each fiscal year thereafter] until fiscal year 2027-2028, $35,000,000 of which shall be from revenues deposited into the fund under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9502(a) (relating to imposition of tax).(D) $30,000,000 annually in fiscal year 2027-2028 and each fiscal year thereafter.* * *(4) Annually, any money not allocated under paragraphs 20260SB1365PN1784 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1), (2) and (3) or as provided in subsection (b), $35,000,000 of which shall be from revenues deposited into the fund under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9502(a), shall be transferred to the Commonwealth Financing Authority and used to fund eligible programs. The authority shall develop guidelines for use of the money for eligible programs, which shall include the requirements of section 2106 (relating to local match).(b) Automatic adjustments.--* * *(3) The department shall do all of the following:(i) Determine the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the period beginning February 1, 2025, and ending January 31, 2027, and for each succeeding 24-month period.(ii) Apply, as of July 1, 2027, the increase under subparagraph (i) to the then current costs amount under subsection (a)(2)(ii)(D).Section 2. Section 5102 of Title 74 is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 5102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Aircraft operating area." A surface area of an aviation facility intended for the landing, takeoff, taxiing, parking or ground movement of aircraft.* * *"Airport Improvement Program." The Federal Airport Improvement Program.20260SB1365PN1784 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Alternative aviation fuel." A fuel or energy source, other than aviation gasoline taxed under section 6121 (relating to tax on aviation fuels) or jet fuel taxed under section 6131 (relating to tax on jet fuels), that is used or intended for use to power, propel or operate an aircraft, aircraft engine, propeller, rotor system or other aircraft propulsion system, including hydrogen fuel, electricity or another fuel or energy source determined by the department by regulation.* * *"Aviation development grant." An aviation development grant under 67 Pa. Code Ch. 473 (relating to aviation development grants)."Aviation facility." An airport, heliport or other area of land or water, including associated buildings, facilities and improvements, that is used or intended for use for the landing, takeoff, storage or surface movement of aircraft, including airplanes, rotorcraft and powered-lift aircraft, and that is required to be licensed by the department under 67 Pa. Code Ch. 471 (relating to airport rating and licensing).* * *"Aviation Restricted Account." The account into which revenues generated from the sources in section 5103(d) (relating to Aviation Restricted Account) are deposited.* * *"Bureau." The Bureau of Aviation of the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Commercial aircraft." An aircraft that is used, leased or offered for compensation or hire in the transportation of persons or property, such as operations conducted under 14 CFR Pt. 121 (relating to operating requirements: domestic, flag, and 20260SB1365PN1784 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supplemental operations), 135 (relating to operating requirements: commuter and on demand operations and rules governing persons on board such aircraft) or 380 (relating to public charters). The term includes air carriers, air taxis, charter services and scheduled or unscheduled freight and passenger operations.* * *"Director." The Director of the bureau."FAA." The Federal Aviation Administration.* * *"Noncommercial aircraft." An aircraft that is not used for compensation or hire and is operated solely for personal, recreational, instruction, governmental or corporate use not involving the transport of persons or property for compensation or hire. The term includes aircraft operated under 14 CFR Pt. 91 (relating to general operating and flight rules) or exclusively by nonprofit organizations or government entities for official business.* * *"Paved aircraft operating area." An aircraft operating area constructed of asphalt, concrete, bituminous surface treatment or other hardened or engineered material, including prefabricated or modular systems, or another surface determined by the bureau to be equivalent to a paved surface."Person." As follows:(1) A corporation, company, association, society, firm, partnership or joint stock company.(2) The term includes an individual, the Commonwealth and all political subdivisions of the Commonwealth or agencies or instrumentalities.20260SB1365PN1784 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Private aviation facility." An aviation facility that is not open to the public for general aeronautical use and is limited to the owner or persons authorized by the owner.* * *"Sponsor." As defined in 67 Pa. Code § 471.2 (relating to definitions).* * *"Unmanned aircraft." An aircraft that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft."Unmanned aircraft system." An unmanned aircraft and associated elements, including communication links and the components that control the unmanned aircraft, that are required for the pilot in command to operate safely and efficiently in the national airspace system."Unpaved aircraft operating area." An aircraft operating area consisting of turf, grass, gravel, dirt, sand or another natural or prepared surface that is not a paved aircraft operating area.Section 3. Section 5103 of Title 74 is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 5103. Aviation Restricted Account.* * *(d) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the Aviation Restricted Account:(1) Money appropriated by the General Assembly to the Aviation Restricted Account.(2) Proceeds of all taxes assessed under sections 6121 (relating to tax on aviation fuels), 6131 (relating to tax on 20260SB1365PN1784 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jet fuels) and 6132 (relating to tax on alternative aviation fuels).(3) Aircraft registration fees assessed under section 6172 (relating to fee for registration of aircraft).(4) Money collected under sections 5703 (relating to disposition of fines, fees and forfeitures) and 5901 (relating to Harrisburg International Airport).(5) Proceeds from the sale of State-owned airports or property thereon.(6) Proceeds from rents, fees and other money derived from the sale, rent or use of an airport under section 5903 (relating to authority of department).(7) Inspection and licensing fees assessed under section 6173 (relating to fees for licensing and inspection of aviation facilities).(8) Money provided for programs related to aviation under section 2104(a)(1)(i) (relating to use of money in fund).(9) Money in the Aviation Trust Fund that the bureau reasonably deems necessary to transfer to the Aviation Restricted Account to fund specifically identified projects or other expenditures eligible for Aviation Restricted Account money.(10) Proceeds of all excise taxes upon the use of fuel in aircraft engines.(11) The cost of the use of department aircraft by Commonwealth agencies and the General Assembly, charged pursuant to section 5302 (relating to aircraft for official use).(12) Money collected for civil penalties, enforcement 20260SB1365PN1784 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recoveries and costs under sections 5704 (relating to prohibited conduct) and 6172 (relating to fee for registration of aircraft).(13) Interest earned on the Aviation Restricted Account.(e) Use.--Money in the Aviation Restricted Account shall be used solely for lawful aviation purposes authorized under this title and applicable Federal law as follows:(1) To award grants under section 6122 (relating to allocation of funds).(2) To allocate the greater of the following amounts to the respective airports from which money was collected under sections 6121, 6131 and 6132, in proportion to the collections attributable to each airport, to be used by the sponsors of the airports for any lawful aviation purpose for which aviation development grant money may be used under 67 Pa. Code Ch. 473 (relating to aviation development grants), including terminals or other revenue-generating airport development projects, or for local matching funds:(i) 50% of money deposited into the Aviation Restricted Account under sections 6121, 6131 and 6132.(ii) An amount equal to 10% of the annual Federal Aviation Administration entitlement funding attributable to the respective airport for that fiscal year, including money apportioned or otherwise allocated by formula, eligibility classification or other nondiscretionary method, as determined by the department.(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (i) and (ii), a licensed public-use airport that receives aviation fuel deliveries attributable under this paragraph and is determined eligible by the department shall receive not 20260SB1365PN1784 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 less than $25,000 annually under this paragraph.(iv) Money distributed under this paragraph that is not expended or contractually obligated by an airport sponsor during a fiscal year may be retained by the sponsor and carried forward for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years for eligible aviation purposes under this section.(3) 10% of the balance shall be used to fund aviation workforce development programs as follows:(i) Half of the balance under this paragraph shall be allocated to an organization described under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) in effect on the effective date of this subparagraph, operating at a public airport located in a county of the fourth class with a population between 133,000 and 134,000 based on the most recent Federal decennial census and established to promote aviation workforce development, education and emerging aeronautical technologies in partnership with State, local, educational and industry stakeholders.(ii) Half of the balance under this paragraph shall be allocated to aviation workforce development programs selected by the director.(4) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), the remaining balance of the Aviation Restricted Account may be used for the following:(A) Aviation development grants.(B) State or local matching funds required for eligible projects as determined by the bureau.(C) Programs of Statewide significance, 20260SB1365PN1784 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including, but not limited to, pavement preservation, pavement maintenance, obstruction identification, obstruction mitigation and obstruction removal.(D) Any other lawful aviation purpose authorized under this title, other applicable State law or applicable FAA requirements governing the eligible use of aviation funds.(ii) (A) Subject to clause (B), money allocated to the department under subparagraph (i) in any fiscal year may not exceed 10% of the total amount appropriated to the Aviation Restricted Account for that fiscal year.(B) An additional amount from the Aviation Restricted Account equal to 10% of money made available to the department in that fiscal year by the FAA for distribution, administration or disbursement by the Commonwealth may be used solely for costs directly related to administration of those funds.(5) Money in the Aviation Restricted Account may not be diverted for any other purpose.(f) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the Aviation Restricted Account is continuously appropriated to the department.Section 4. Title 74 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5104. Aviation Trust Fund. (a) Establishment.--The Aviation Trust Fund is established as a fund in the State Treasury.(b) Sources.--The following shall be deposited into the Aviation Trust Fund:20260SB1365PN1784 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) 0.425% of the amount collected under Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, shall be deposited into the Aviation Trust Fund annually by the 20th day of the month following the end of each fiscal year.(2) Other appropriations, deposits or transfers.(3) All interest earned on money in the account. (c) Use.--Money in the Aviation Trust Fund shall be used in the following manner:(1) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii) and (iii), twice per fiscal year, the bureau may transfer to the Aviation Restricted Account money allocated under paragraph (2)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv) or (v).(ii) A transfer under this paragraph may not exceed 25% of the amount allocated under paragraph (2)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv) or (v) during the applicable fiscal year.(iii) A transfer under this paragraph may only consist of money that remains unobligated or uncommitted and shall be used to directly support airports or aviation activities otherwise eligible for funding from the Aviation Restricted Account under this title.(2) The remaining balance of money in the Aviation Trust Fund shall be distributed as follows for the uses under paragraph (3):(i) 25% shall be allocated to directly support commercial service airports, as defined in 49 U.S.C. § 47102(7) (relating to definitions) on the effective date of this subparagraph.(ii) 20% shall be allocated to directly support general aviation airports, as defined by 49 U.S.C. § 20260SB1365PN1784 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 47102(8).(iii) 10% shall be allocated to directly support public airports that do not receive scheduled passenger aircraft service and are not included in the National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems in effect on the effective date of this subparagraph, as published by the FAA.(iv) 10% shall be allocated to the development of airport hangars at airports included under subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iii).(v) 15% shall be allocated to grants or investments to develop emerging aviation technologies, including, advanced air mobility, electric vertical takeoff and landing aircraft, unmanned aircraft systems, supersonic aircraft and aircraft battery technologies and alternative aviation fuels.(vi) 2% shall be allocated to fund: (A) A Statewide aviation technical assistance program that provides training, education and technical support to aviation facilities, sponsors and workforce participants within this Commonwealth, modeled after established local transportation assistance programs and administered by an existing nonprofit trade association representing the aviation industry within this Commonwealth on a Statewide basis.(B) An existing annual aviation conference hosted within this Commonwealth by an existing nonprofit trade association representing the aviation industry within this Commonwealth on a Statewide 20260SB1365PN1784 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 basis, which provides education, training and industry coordination opportunities for aviation stakeholders.(vii) 0.5% shall be allocated to the Aviation Advisory Committee to cover the committee's expenses in performing the duties under section 6304 (relating to Aviation Advisory Committee).(viii) 7.5% shall be allocated for use by the bureau.(ix) An amount not exceeding 10% of the amount shall be allocated to the bureau for the cost administering and disbursing the Aviation Trust Fund.(3) (i) The bureau may award aviation opportunity grants from money allocated under paragraph (2)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v) and (vi) to entities determined eligible by the bureau for aviation-related purposes within this Commonwealth that provide a direct benefit to the Pennsylvania aviation system.(ii) An aviation opportunity grant may be used for lawful capital, operating or financing expenditures, including debt service and financing costs, that are not otherwise eligible for reimbursement through the Aviation Restricted Account or that the bureau determines are more appropriately funded under this section, including for:(A) Airport development, capital improvement projects, hangars, terminals, fuel farms, utilities, access roads, maintenance, reconstruction, rehabilitation and pavement preservation.(B) Commercial air service development, route development, marketing, minimum revenue guarantees, 20260SB1365PN1784 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other air service incentives and aviation economic development initiatives.(C) Operating costs necessary for the safe and continued operation of aviation facilities, including deicing, snow removal, emergency expenses, airport marketing, financial assistance and financing support.(D) Vertiports, heliports, unmanned aircraft systems infrastructure, advanced aviation technologies, electric aviation infrastructure, hydrogen aviation infrastructure, planning, innovation and aviation safety programs.(E) Projects serving multiple purposes under this paragraph, provided that expenditures are attributed by the bureau to the appropriate allocation category under paragraph (2).(F) Any other aviation-related purpose project determined by the bureau to provide a direct benefit to the Commonwealth aviation system and to be consistent with this chapter.(iii) Funding under this paragraph shall be consistent with the applicable allocation category under paragraph (2).(4) The money in the Aviation Trust Fund may not be diverted for any other purpose.(d) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the Aviation Trust Fund is continuously appropriated to the department.Section 5. Chapter 53 heading of Title 74 is amended to read:CHAPTER 5320260SB1365PN1784 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [AUTHORITY OF] DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONSection 6. Section 5301(e) heading, (1) and (2) of Title 74 are amended, subsections (b) and (e) are amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5301. Authority of department.* * *(b) Specific powers.--The department is authorized to:* * *(11) Develop, implement, administer and support programs related to commercial air service development, aviation workforce development, emerging aviation technologies, aviation economic development and programs of Statewide significance.* * *(e) Limitation on powers and Commonwealth participation.--(1) No license for a new airport, which is proposed to be located within a five-mile radius of an existing airport, or for the conversion of a military airport to joint use shall be issued by the department unless it has held a public hearing on the license application. The hearing shall be held in the area where the proposed airport is to be located and at least 60 days' notice of the date, time and place of the hearing shall be given to the public in at least one newspaper of general circulation. No license shall be issued unless the department is satisfied that fair consideration has been given to the interest of the communities in or near which the proposed airport is to be located [and in no event shall the department license any airport within two miles of the boundary of an existing airport] and there is no impact 20260SB1365PN1784 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on aviation safety. Any person aggrieved by a decision of the department to grant or deny a license for a new airport or for a conversion of a military airport to joint use may take an appeal as provided in Title 2 (relating to administrative law and procedure). Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as applying to the licensing of heliports, existing airports, upgrading of existing airports or airports under construction unless for conversion of military airports to joint use.(2) [Any] (i) Except as provided for under subparagraph (ii), a license for an airport issued by the department shall be effective for a period not less than [two years] one year from the date of [its] issuance. The department may revoke an airport license upon proof of any violation of law or regulation relating to aviation.(ii) A license for an airport issued under 67 Pa. Code § 471.3(c) (relating to airport licensing) shall be effective for a period of not more than 60 days after the date of issuance.* * *(4) Except as otherwise required by Federal law, a grant awarded by the department under this part or 67 Pa. Code Ch. 473 (relating to aviation development grants), including the non-Federal share of federally assisted projects, shall require Commonwealth participation in an amount not less than 75% and not more than 100% of eligible project costs, as determined by the department.(f) Annual spending report.--By January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the bureau shall:(1) Issue a report on the status and use of money in the 20260SB1365PN1784 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Aviation Restricted Account and the Aviation Trust Fund during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include:(i) The beginning and ending balances of the Aviation Restricted Account and the Aviation Trust Fund.(ii) The source and amount of money distributed, expended, obligated, committed or awarded as grants from the Aviation Restricted Account and the Aviation Trust Fund.(iii) The recipient and purpose of each distribution, expenditure, obligation, commitment or grant, including a concise description of each project or activity.(iv) The amount expended by the bureau for administrative costs associated with the administration and disbursement of money from the Aviation Restricted Account and the Aviation Trust Fund.(v) The amount of unobligated or uncommitted money remaining at the end of the fiscal year.(2) Deliver copies of the report issued under paragraph (1) to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) Post the report issued under paragraph (1) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 7. Title 74 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 5704. Prohibited conduct.(a) Violations.--A person that creates, establishes or permits an obstruction or airport hazard, or fails to comply with an order issued by the department under this part, commits 20260SB1365PN1784 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a violation of this part.(b) Civil penalty.--A person that violates subsection (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. Each day that a violation continues shall constitute a separate violation.(c) Enforcement.--The department may assess and collect civil penalties under this section or may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce this part, including seeking injunctive relief or other appropriate remedies.(d) Disposition.--All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the Aviation Restricted Account.§ 5906. Abandoned or derelict aircraft.(a) Authority.--The department may establish procedures for the identification, notice, custody, removal, storage, sale or other disposition of abandoned or derelict aircraft located at an aviation facility within this Commonwealth.(b) Costs.--The department may provide, by regulation or procedure, for the recovery of reasonable costs associated with actions taken under this section.(c) Regulations.--The department may promulgate regulations, forms and guidance necessary to administer this section.Section 8. Section 5912 of Title 74 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5912. Power to adopt airport zoning regulations.* * *(b.1) Enforcement.--If a municipality fails to adopt, administer or enforce airport zoning regulations as required under this section, the department may enforce the provisions of this subchapter to prevent or mitigate airport hazards within the municipality.20260SB1365PN1784 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 9. Sections 6103(a), 6121, 6122 and 6124(a), Subchapter C heading of Chapter 61 and section 6131 of Title 74 are amended to read:§ 6103. Service fees.(a) General rule.--The department may by regulation establish appropriate fees for aviation services including:(1) Crash fire rescue training.[(2) Landing area site inspections.(3) Issuance of private airport licenses.](4) Special aviation license board meetings.(5) Derelict or abandoned aircraft.* * *§ 6121. Tax on aviation fuels.(a) [Imposition] Initial imposition.--There is hereby imposed, effective July 1, 1984 through July 1, 2027, an additional State tax of 1.5¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, on all fuels used or sold and delivered by distributors within this Commonwealth for use as fuel in propeller-driven piston aircraft or aircraft engines as provided for in [the act of May 21, 1931 (P.L.149, No.105), known as The Liquid Fuels Tax Act] 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax).(a.1) Imposition.--There is hereby imposed, effective July 1, 2027, an additional State tax of 24¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, on all fuels delivered by distributors within this Commonwealth for use as fuel in propeller-driven piston aircraft or aircraft engines as provided for in 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 90 . (b) [Annual] Initial annual adjustment.--Beginning on January 1, 1985, [and each January 1 thereafter] and ending on 20260SB1365PN1784 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 January 1, 2028, the tax imposed under [this section] subsection (a) shall be adjusted annually and shall be set for that calendar year. The adjustment shall be based upon the percentage change of the Producer Price Index for Jet Fuel, as determined by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the United States Department of Labor for the most recent 12-month period available as of the immediately preceding November 1. For every 10% increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index, there shall be a 0.1¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, increase or decrease in the rate of tax. The rate of tax shall be determined by the Secretary of Revenue, who shall cause such rate to be published as a notice pursuant to 45 Pa.C.S. § 725(a)(3) (relating to additional contents of Pennsylvania Bulletin) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin on or before December 15 of each year. The tax, as adjusted, shall never exceed 6¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, nor shall it be less than 3¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof.(b.1) Annual adjustment.--Beginning on January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, the tax imposed under subsection (a.1) shall be adjusted annually and shall be set for that calendar year. The adjustment shall be based upon the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. The tax rate shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the CPI-U for the 12-month period ending on the most recent October 31, and the denominator of which is the CPI-U for the 12-month period ending on October 31 of the prior year. The resulting adjusted tax rate shall be rounded to the nearest $0.001. The rate of tax shall be determined by the Secretary of 20260SB1365PN1784 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Revenue, who shall cause such rate to be published as a notice pursuant to 45 Pa.C.S. § 725(a)(3) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin on or before December 15 of each year.(c) Construction of section.--[This](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall be construed in conjunction with [The Liquid Fuels Tax Act] 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 90, which shall apply to the collection, administration and enforcement of the tax imposed under this section.(2) 75 Pa.C.S. § 9004 (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) does not apply to the extent that section imposes a tax.(d) Disposition of taxes.--Money collected from the taxes imposed under this section shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Aviation Restricted Account.§ 6122. Allocation of funds.(a) Grants.--[Each year the] The owner of a public airport that meets the criteria under subsection (b.1) shall be eligible for [a] an annual grant from the local real estate tax reimbursement portion of the Aviation Restricted Account. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), the grant shall be equal to the amount of local real estate tax paid on those portions of an airport which are aviation-related areas.(b) Application form.--The owner of a public airport shall apply for the grant provided for in this section in the manner and on the forms as prescribed by the department.(b.1) Eligibility requirements and criteria.--The department may only issue a grant under this section to an airport that satisfies the following criteria:(1) The airport is a licensed public airport located in 20260SB1365PN1784 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this Commonwealth.(2) The amount of reimbursement requested by an airport owner represents only that portion of local real estate taxes which represents the aviation-related area of the airport for which the owner requests reimbursement.(3) The local real estate taxes for the year requested has been paid by the airport owner.(4) The amount of reimbursement requested does not include amounts which represent late payments, penalties or interest.[(c) Notice to State Treasurer.--The department, following its review of each application for a grant, shall notify the State Treasurer of each applicant who qualifies therefor and the amount of the grant to which each applicant is eligible. Within 30 days of receiving the notification, the State Treasurer shall issue the grant to the qualifying applicant.](d) Limit on grant.--The total grant of moneys in any one year shall not exceed a sum equal to [the moneys collected on the sale of fuels sold for use in propeller-driven piston aircraft or aircraft engines for the previous year, plus any income earned on the fund. In the event that there are insufficient funds in the fund] one-tenth of the appropriation to the Aviation Restricted Account for that fiscal year. If the amount of money appropriated is insufficient to meet the total annual grants provided for under this section, the department shall make such grants on a pro rata basis. [In the event that there are surplus funds in the fund with which to meet the total annual grants provided for under this section, the department may make additional grants to public airport owners, which shall be used for airport development purposes.20260SB1365PN1784 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Administrative costs.--The costs of administering the grant program under this section shall be paid out of the revenues described in section 5103(c) (relating to Aviation Restricted Account). The costs of administering this program shall not exceed 10% of such revenues collected for that year.](f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aviation-related area." The portion of an aviation facility, including land, buildings, structures, facilities and improvements, that is used or intended to be used for the landing, takeoff, taxiing, parking, storage, servicing, fueling, maintenance or operation of aircraft, for passenger or cargo aeronautical activities, for airport safety or security purposes, or for other aeronautical purposes approved by the department. The term does not include areas primarily used for nonaviation commercial, residential or unrelated industrial purposes.§ 6124. Agreement of maintenance.(a) Terms.--Prior to applying for an appropriation under section 6122 (relating to allocation of funds), every public airport owner shall enter into an agreement with the department. This agreement shall specify that the owner shall continue to maintain the property for which the grant will be sought as an airport, at least equal in size and capacity to its size and capacity as of the owner's initial grant application, for a period of not less than [ten] 20 years.* * *SUBCHAPTER C[JET FUELS TAX] AIRCRAFT FUEL TAXES20260SB1365PN1784 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6131. Tax on jet fuels.(a) [Imposition] Initial imposition.--There is hereby imposed, effective July 1, 1984, and ending January 1, 2027, a State tax of 1.1¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, on all fuels used or sold and delivered by distributors within this Commonwealth for use as fuel in turbine-propeller jet, turbojet and jet-driven aircraft and aircraft engines. The tax shall be increased by 0.2¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, effective January 1, 1985, and by 0.2¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, effective July 1, 1985. Distributors shall be liable to the Commonwealth for the collection and payment of the tax imposed by this section. The tax shall be collected by the distributor and shall be paid to the Commonwealth only once with respect to any fuels.(a.1) Imposition.--There is hereby imposed, effective January 1, 2027, a State tax of 8¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, on all fuels delivered by distributors within this Commonwealth for use as fuel in turbine-propeller jet, turbojet and jet-driven aircraft and aircraft engines. Distributors shall be liable to the Commonwealth for the collection and payment of the tax imposed by this section. The tax shall be collected by the distributor and shall be paid to the Commonwealth only once with respect to any fuels.(b) [Annual] Initial annual adjustment.--Beginning on January 1, 1986, [and each January 1 thereafter] and ending January 1, 2028, the tax imposed under this [section] subsection (a) shall be adjusted annually and shall be set for that calendar year. The adjustment shall be based upon the percentage change of the Producer Price Index for Jet Fuel, as determined by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the United States 20260SB1365PN1784 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Labor, for the most recent 12-month period available as of the immediately preceding November 1. For every 10% increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index, as determined by comparing the index for the first month of the 12-month period with the index for the last month of the period, there shall be a 0.1¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, increase or decrease in the rate of tax. The rate of tax shall be determined by the Secretary of Revenue, who shall cause such rate to be published as a notice pursuant to 45 Pa.C.S. § 725(a)(3) (relating to additional contents of Pennsylvania Bulletin) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin on or before December 15 of each year. The tax, as adjusted, shall never exceed 2¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof, nor shall it be less than 1.5¢ per gallon, or fractional part thereof.(b.1) Annual adjustment.--Beginning on January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, the tax imposed under subsection (a.1) shall be adjusted annually and shall be set for that calendar year. The adjustment shall be based upon the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. The tax rate shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the CPI-U for the 12-month period ending on the most recent October 31, and the denominator of which is the CPI-U for the 12-month period ending on October 31 of the prior year. The resulting adjusted tax rate shall be rounded to the nearest $0.001. The rate of tax shall be determined by the Secretary of Revenue, who shall cause such rate to be published as a notice pursuant to 45 Pa.C.S. § 725(a)(3) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin on or before December 15 of each year.20260SB1365PN1784 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Construction of section.--[This section shall be construed in conjunction with the act of May 21, 1931 (P.L.149, No.105), known as The Liquid Fuels Tax Act, as if jet fuels were liquid fuels as defined in that act, and all of the provisions of that act, except for section 4 thereof to the extent it imposes any tax, shall apply to the collection, administration and enforcement of the tax imposed under this section. Upon the effective date of the tax imposed by this section upon jet fuels, such jet fuels shall not be subject to the tax imposed by the act of January 14, 1952 (1951 P.L.1965, No.550), known as the Fuel Use Tax Act, except that dealer-users shall remain liable to report and pay the fuel use tax on any jet fuels used thereafter upon which the tax provided by this section has not been imposed.](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall be construed in conjunction with 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax), which shall apply to the collection, administration and enforcement of the tax imposed under this section.(2) 75 Pa.C.S. § 9004 (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) does not apply to the extent that section imposes a tax.(d) Disposition of taxes.--[All moneys collected] Money collected from the taxes imposed under this section shall be deposited by the State Treasurer in the Aviation Restricted Account.Section 10. Title 74 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6132. Tax on alternative aviation fuels. (a) Imposition.--There is hereby imposed a State tax on alternative aviation fuel delivered within this Commonwealth for 20260SB1365PN1784 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 use to power, propel or operate an aircraft, aircraft engine, propeller, rotor system or other aircraft propulsion system. A distributor, charging station operator, airport sponsor, fixed base operator, tenant or other person selling, delivering or dispensing alternative aviation fuel for aircraft use shall be liable to the Commonwealth for the collection and payment of the tax imposed under this section. The tax shall be collected and paid to the Commonwealth only once with respect to the alternative aviation fuel.(b) Rate.--The tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be computed by the Department of Revenue as follows:(1) Beginning January 1, 2030, at 25% of the tax applicable to one gallon of jet fuel on a jet-fuel gallon equivalent basis.(2) Beginning January 1, 2035, at 50% of the tax applicable to one gallon of jet fuel on a jet-fuel gallon equivalent basis.(3) Beginning January 1, 2040, at 100% of the tax applicable to one gallon of jet fuel on a jet-fuel gallon equivalent basis.(c) Publication.--The Department of Revenue shall publish the applicable tax rates, equivalent taxable units, reporting requirements and forms by notice transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(d) Construction.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), this section shall be construed in conjunction with 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax), and the provisions of that chapter relating to licensing, bonding, returns, assessments, audits, interest, penalties, collections and 20260SB1365PN1784 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.(2) 75 Pa.C.S. § 9004 (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) shall not apply to the extent that section separately imposes a tax on alternative aviation fuel used for aircraft propulsion.(e) Disposition of taxes.--Money collected from the taxes imposed under this section shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Aviation Restricted Account.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Jet-fuel gallon equivalent basis." The amount of any alternative aviation fuel as determined by the Department of Revenue to contain 125,000 British thermal units. The rate of tax on the amount of each alternative aviation fuel as determined by the Department of Revenue under the previous sentence shall be the applicable tax imposed on one gallon of jet fuel under section 6131 (relating to tax on jet fuels).Section 11. Chapter 61 of Title 74 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER FAVIATION FEESSec.6171. Definitions.6172. Fee for registration of aircraft.6173. Fees for licensing and inspection of aviation facilities.§ 6171. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20260SB1365PN1784 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Based aircraft." An aircraft that is primarily based at an airport, heliport or aviation facility within this Commonwealth, as determined by the bureau."Public aircraft." An aircraft operated in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 40102(a)(41) (relating to definitions) at the time of passage in effect on the effective date of this definition.§ 6172. Fee for registration of aircraft.(a) Imposition.-- Beginning January 1, 2028, for the annual registration of an aircraft with the bureau, an aircraft registration fee shall be imposed annually as follows:(1) For noncommercial aircraft, the fee shall be $25 multiplied by the aircraft's seating capacity, as determined by the bureau, with a maximum total fee of $750.(2) For commercial aircraft, the fee shall be $50 multiplied by the aircraft's seating capacity, as determined by the bureau, with a maximum total fee of $2,500.(b) Determination.-- For purposes of this section, seating capacity shall be determined by the bureau based on FAA records, aircraft certifications, manufacturer specifications or other reliable documentation acceptable to the bureau.(c) Registration.-- A based aircraft located within this Commonwealth shall annually register with the bureau in a form and manner prescribed by the bureau. The registration shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the aircraft owner.(2) The Federal Aviation Administration registration number of the aircraft.(3) The make, model and serial number of the aircraft.(4) The airport, heliport or aviation facility at which 20260SB1365PN1784 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the aircraft owner identifies the aircraft as primarily based.(5) Any other information required by the bureau for administration and enforcement of this section.(d) Verification.--(1) The bureau may verify whether an aircraft is a based aircraft and verify the primary base airport of the aircraft using FAA records, hangar or tie-down agreements, airport sponsor reporting, fuel purchase records, aircraft operations data or other reliable documentation acceptable to the bureau.(2) The bureau may investigate and determine the primary base airport of an aircraft if conflicting information exists regarding where the aircraft is based.(3) A determination made by the bureau under this subsection shall govern for purposes of this title and regulations promulgated under this title.(e) Enforcement.--(1) The bureau may impose a civil penalty upon an owner of an aircraft that:(i) Fails to register an aircraft required to be registered under this section.(ii) Provides false information in a registration filing.(iii) Fails to update material registration information required by the bureau.(iv) Fails to pay a fee imposed under this section.(2) A civil penalty imposed under paragraph (1) may not exceed $500 per violation, in addition to any unpaid registration fees, interest or penalties otherwise authorized 20260SB1365PN1784 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by law.(f) Fee exemptions.-- The fee imposed under subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) Public aircraft.(2) Unmanned aircraft.§ 6173. Fees for licensing and inspection of aviation facilities.(a) Licensure and inspection.--Each aviation facility shall be licensed and subject to inspection by the department in accordance with this section and 67 Pa. Code Ch. 471 (relating to airport rating and licensing).(b) Licensing fee.--Upon authorization to establish, maintain or operate an aviation facility under 67 Pa. Code § 471.3 (relating to airport licensing), each private aviation facility shall pay a licensing fee to the bureau as follows:(1) $250 for a private aviation facility containing only unpaved aircraft operating areas per year.(2) $500 for a private aviation facility containing one or more paved aircraft operating areas per year.(c) Inspection fee.--Each airport under subsection (b) shall pay to the bureau:(1) an initial inspection fee of $600 for the first five-year period; and(2) a reinspection fee of $300 for each five-year period thereafter.(d) Deposit.--Fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the Aviation Restricted Account.Section 12. Sections 9004(c), 9006(a), 9010(e)(3) and 9017(e) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 9004. Imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions.20260SB1365PN1784 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(c) Aviation gasoline tax.--In lieu of the taxes under subsection (b), a tax imposed under:(1) [A State tax of 1 1/2¢ a gallon or fractional part thereof is imposed and assessed upon all liquid fuels used or sold and delivered by distributors within this Commonwealth for use as fuel in propeller-driven piston engine aircraft or aircraft engines] 74 Pa.C.S. § 6121 (relating to tax on aviation fuels).(2) [A State tax of 1 1/2¢ a gallon or fractional part thereof is imposed and assessed upon all liquid fuels used or sold and delivered by distributors within this Commonwealth for use as fuel in turbine-propeller jet, turbojet or jet- driven aircraft or aircraft engines] 74 Pa.C.S. § 6131 (relating to tax on jet fuels).(3) 74 Pa.C.S. § 6132 (relating to tax on alternative aviation fuels).* * *§ 9006. Distributor's report and payment of tax.(a) Monthly report.--(1) For the purpose of ascertaining the amount of tax payable under this chapter, the distributor, on or before the 20th day of each month, shall transmit to the department on a form prescribed by the department a report, under oath or affirmation, of the liquid fuels and fuels used or delivered by that distributor within this Commonwealth during the preceding month. The report shall show the number of gallons of liquid fuels and fuels used or delivered within this Commonwealth during the period for which that report is made and any further information that the department prescribes. A 20260SB1365PN1784 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributor having more than one place of business within this Commonwealth shall combine in each report the use or delivery of liquid fuels and fuels at all such separate places of business.(2) (i) In addition to the reporting requirements under paragraph (1), the monthly report shall separately identify aviation fuels delivered, used or intended for use at an aviation facility within this Commonwealth and all of the following:(A) the applicable airport identifier assigned or recognized by the department;(B) the number of gallons delivered, used or intended for use;(C) the type of aviation fuel; and(D) any other information prescribed by the department.(ii) The reporting requirements under this paragraph shall apply regardless of whether the aviation fuel is exempt from taxation under this chapter and regardless of any exchange agreement, balancing arrangement, title transfer or distributor-to-distributor transaction.(3) The department shall transmit airport-specific aviation fuel data reported under paragraph (2) to the Department of Transportation for administration of aviation funding programs under this title.* * *§ 9010. Disposition and use of tax.* * *(e) Appropriation.--* * *20260SB1365PN1784 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(3) The tax of 1 1/2¢ a gallon imposed and assessed on liquid fuels used or sold and delivered for use as a fuel in propeller-driven aircraft or aircraft engines, the tax of 1 1/2¢ a gallon on liquid fuels used or sold and delivered for use as a fuel in jet or turbojet-propelled aircraft or aircraft engines in lieu of other taxes, all penalties and interests and all interest earned on deposits of the Liquid Fuels Tax Fund shall be paid into the Motor License Fund. This money is specifically appropriated for the same purposes for which money in the Motor License Fund is appropriated by law.]§ 9017. Refunds.* * *[(e) Aircraft.--A person shall be reimbursed in the amount of the excess if a person uses liquid fuel on which a tax imposed by this chapter in excess of 1 1/2¢ per gallon has been paid in:(1) a propeller-driven aircraft or aircraft engines; or(2) a jet or turbojet-propelled aircraft or aircraft engines.]* * *Section 13. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 74 Pa.C.S. § 5103(d).(2) Section 530 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is repealed.Section 14. Abrogations are as follows:(1) The provisions of 67 Pa. Code § 471.2 (relating to 20260SB1365PN1784 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the amendment or addition of 74 Pa.C.S. §§ 5102 and 6173.(2) The provisions of 67 Pa. Code § 471.3 (relating to airport licensing) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the amendment or addition of 74 Pa.C.S. §§ 5301 and 6173.(3) The provisions of 67 Pa. Code § 471.8 (relating to suspension, revocation and penalties) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 74 Pa.C.S. §§ 5704 and 5912(b.1).(4) The provisions of 67 Pa. Code § 473.5 (relating to project costs and grant limits) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 74 Pa.C.S. § 5301(e)(4).(5) The provisions of 67 Pa. Code Ch. 479 (relating to obstructions to air navigation) are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 74 Pa.C.S. §§ 5704 and 5912(b.1).(6) The provisions of 67 Pa. Code § 471.4 (relating to licensing fees (private airports only)) are abrogated.(7) Any regulation inconsistent with this act is abrogated insofar as it is inconsistent with this act.Section 15. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1365PN1784 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324